District of Columbia statutes.
22-2904

Repealed

Sale of unwholesome food — Council to make rules and regulations.

Repealed.

Dec. 16, 1941, 55 Stat. 808, ch. 587, § 4
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(f), 49 DCR 1945
1981 Ed., § 22-3419.
1973 Ed., § 22-3419.
Section 8(f) of D.C. Law 14-55 repealed §§ 22-2901 to 22-2907.
Section 10(b) of D.C. Law 14-55 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(f) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(208) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.